Washington statutes.
RCW 43.56.040

Travel expenses of members.

No member of the commission shall receive any compensation for services, but each member shall be paid travel expenses incurred in the discharge of official duty in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, after the account thereof has been audited by the commission.

The commission shall keep a full account of its expenditures and shall report it in each report. The commission shall allow expenses for only one meeting of the commission within this state each year, and shall allow expenses for the members to attend, no more than once in each year, any conference of the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws, or its successor, outside of this state.

[ 2009 c 218 s 3; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 118; 1965 c 8 s 43.56.040. Prior: 1955 c 91 s 1; 1905 c 59 s 4; RRS s 8207.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.